Connecticut, session 2026, HB05154.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Except as prohibited in
subdivision (1) of subsection (i) of section 22a-208a of the general
statutes, the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection
may, notwithstanding any provision of title 22a of the general statutes,
issue a general permit for any activity that the commissioner may
authorize by issuance of an individual permit provided the
commissioner determines that such activity both separately and
cumulatively causes minimal environmental effects. Such
determination shall be specified in the public notice for any such general
permit noticed pursuant to this section.
Sec. 2. Subsection (j) of section 22a-208a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(j) When a permittee makes a sufficient application for the renewal of
an individual permit to operate a solid waste facility, in accordance with
the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, the permit shall be
deemed renewed if, not less than ninety days after conducting a
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5154
technical review and determining the application is sufficient, the
commissioner does not sign a notice of tentative determination to
approve or deny the application. The application to renew a solid waste
facility individual permit to operate shall be made on a form prescribed
by the commissioner and accompanied by the applicable fee. Nothing
in this subsection shall be construed to limit the commissioner's
authority to review all aspects of the permittee's existing operations and
the application to renew, including, but not limited to, exercising any
authority described in section 22a-6m.
[(j)] (k) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection
may issue an approval for a demonstration project for any activity
regulated by the commissioner under this chapter provided the
commissioner determines that such demonstration project (1) is
necessary to research, develop or promote methods and technologies of
solid waste management which are consistent with the goals of the state-
wide solid waste management plan; (2) does not pose a significant risk
to human health or the environment; and (3) is not inconsistent with the
federal Water Pollution Control Act, the federal Rivers and Harbors Act,
the federal Clean Air Act or the federal Resource Conservation and
Recovery Act. An application for such approval shall be on a form
prescribed by the commissioner, be accompanied by a fee of one
thousand dollars and shall provide such information as the
commissioner deems necessary. Any person applying for such approval
shall not commence the project prior to the commissioner's written
approval. The commissioner may impose conditions upon such
approval as deemed necessary to adequately protect human health and
the environment or to ensure project success and such approval shall be
valid for a period of not more than two years. The commissioner may
renew such approval provided the total period of approval does not
exceed five years. The commissioner may order summary suspension of
any such approval in accordance with subsection (c) of section 4-182.
Notwithstanding the renewal process, any person may seek, or the
commissioner may require, that the project obtain a general or
individual permit pursuant to this chapter.
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5154
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 22a-208a(j)
ENV Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3